Maine, session 132, LD821.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Allocation. Gross revenues of the Maine Turnpike Authority for the calendar
year ending December 31, 2026 must be segregated, apportioned and disbursed as
designated in the following schedule.
MAINE TURNPIKE AUTHORITY 2026
Administration
Personal Services $1,412,303
All Other 1,787,882
___________
TOTAL $3,200,185
Accounts and Controls
Personal Services $4,663,444
All Other 2,103,293
___________
TOTAL $6,766,737
Highway Maintenance
Personal Services $7,930,364
All Other 5,029,148
___________
TOTAL $12,959,512
Equipment Maintenance
Page 1 - 132LR0366(03)

Personal Services $1,919,744
All Other 3,439,711
___________
TOTAL $5,359,455
Fare Collection
Personal Services $11,455,497
All Other 4,892,710
___________
TOTAL $16,348,207
Public Safety and Special Services
Personal Services $707,267
All Other 9,059,728
___________
TOTAL $9,766,995
Building Maintenance
Personal Services $932,178
All Other 799,637
___________
TOTAL $1,731,815
Subtotal of Line Items Budgeted $56,132,905
General Contingency - 5% of line items $2,806,645
budgeted for 2026 (10% allowed)
MAINE TURNPIKE AUTHORITY ___________
TOTAL REVENUE FUNDS $58,939,550
Sec. 2. Transfer of allocations. Any balance of the allocation for “General
Contingency” made by the Legislature for the Maine Turnpike Authority may be
transferred at any time prior to the closing of the books to any other allocation or
subdivision of any other allocation made by the Legislature for the use of the Maine
Turnpike Authority for the same calendar year. Any balance of any other allocation or
subdivision of any other allocation made by the Legislature for the Maine Turnpike
Authority that at any time is not required for the purpose named in the allocation or
subdivision may be transferred at any time prior to the closing of the books to any other
allocation or subdivision of any other allocation made by the Legislature for the use of the
Maine Turnpike Authority for the same calendar year subject to review by the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters. Financial
statements describing the transfer, other than a transfer from “General Contingency,” must
be submitted by the Maine Turnpike Authority to the Office of Fiscal and Program Review
30 days before the transfer is to be implemented. In case of extraordinary emergency
Page 2 - 132LR0366(03)

transfers, the 30-day prior submission requirement may be waived by vote of the
committee. These financial statements must include information specifying the accounts
that are affected, amounts to be transferred, a description of the transfer and a detailed
explanation as to why the transfer is needed.
Sec. 3. Encumbered balance at year-end. At the end of each calendar year,
encumbered balances may be carried to the next calendar year.
Sec. 4. Supplemental information. As required by the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 23, section 1961, subsection 6, the following statement of the revenues in 2026 that
are necessary for capital expenditures and reserves and to meet the requirements of any
resolution authorizing bonds of the Maine Turnpike Authority during 2026, including debt
service and the maintenance of reserves for debt service and reserve maintenance, is
submitted.
Turnpike Revenue Bond Resolution Adopted 2026
April 18, 1991; Issuance of Bonds Authorized
Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
23, section 1968, subsections 1 and 2-A
Debt Service Fund $44,392,528
Reserve Maintenance Fund 42,000,000
General Reserve Fund, to be applied as
follows:
Capital Improvements 43,441,746
Debt Service Fund under the General 2,442,800
Special Obligation Bond Resolution
Adopted May 15, 1996; Issuance of
Bonds Authorized Pursuant to the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23,
section 1968, subsection 2-A
___________
TOTAL $132,277,074
Page 3 - 132LR0366(03)